Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Any official  ceremony or other event held by state government, as de-
fined in ORS 174.111, to commemorate Memorial Day  or Veterans Day, must be held on the
respective day of the legal holiday as specified in ORS 187.010.
(2) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall ensure  that members of the public have
access to attend or participate in any official ceremony or other event held under  this sec-
tion.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, if circumstances exist that necessitate
an official ceremony or other event to be held  on a day other than the legal holiday, the
Director of Veterans’ Affairs  shall notify the presiding officers of each house of the Legis-
lative Assembly of the circumstances, at least 30 days prior  to the legal holiday to the extent
possible.
SECTION 2. (1) It is the expectation of the Legislative Assembly that  all state-owned and
state-maintained veterans’ facilities, memorials  for honoring veterans and war memorials
be in clean condition and good repair for Memorial Day, Veterans Day and any ceremony or
other event that may be held to commemorate Memorial Day or Veterans Day.
(2) The Director of Veterans’ Affairs shall communicate to all state  agencies in advance
of every Memorial Day and  Veterans Day the expectations described in subsection (1) of this
section.
Enrolled House Bill 3421 (HB 3421-A) Page 1
Passed by House April 14, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3421 (HB 3421-A) Page 2